North Dakota statutes. TITLE 49 Public Utilities
CHAPTER 49-17.2 Regional Railroad Authorities [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

49-17.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-02.
Creation of authority by agreement of subdivisions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-03.
Contents of agreement creating authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-04.
Filing of agreement and resolutions — Certificate of incorporation — Beginning of corporate existence. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-05.
Hearing before adoption of resolution — Publication of notice. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 5; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-06.
Appointment of commissioners of authority — Terms of office — Vacancies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-07.
Power vested in commissioners — Rules for operation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-08.
Chairman and secretary-treasurer of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-09.
Executive director and other agents — Delegation of powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 9; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-10.
Reimbursement of commissioners’ expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-11.
Addition of subdivisions to authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 11; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-12.
Withdrawal of subdivision from authority — Disposition of assets and liabilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 12; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-13.
Filing of resolution increasing or decreasing authority — Amended certificate of incorporation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 13; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-14.
Powers of political subdivisions in aid of regional authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 14; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-15.
Corporate powers of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 15; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-16.
Planning, acquisition, and operation of railroads and facilities — Acquisition of property. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 16; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-17.
Use of public waters by authority — Buildings, roadways, and bridges. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 17; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-18.
Power of eminent domain — Restrictions on acquisition of public or railroad property. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 18; 2007, ch. 293, § 32; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-19.
Public purpose and necessity for acquisitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 19; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-20.
Exemption from taxation of property and income of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 20; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-21.
Annual certification of tax levy for authority — Levy of tax — Collection. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 21; 1983, ch. 606, § 52; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-22.
Zones of benefit — Tax levy applied. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 22; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-23.
Maximum tax levy — County levy not applied in subdivision making levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 23; 1983, ch. 606, § 53; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-24.
Deposit of tax proceeds — Expenditure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 24; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-25.
Covenant to levy taxes until bonds paid. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 25; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-26.
Acceptance and expenditure of federal and other grants and loans. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 26; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-27.
Designation of director of department of transportation as agent of authority — Funds held in separate account. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 27; 1999, ch. 106, § 12; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-28.
Issuance of bonds and notes — Purposes for which proceeds used. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 28; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-29.
Revenues and funds pledged to payment of bonds and notes — Negotiability. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 29; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-30.
Resolutions for bonds or notes — Security agreement — Terms and conditions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 30; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-31.
Mortgages and deeds of trust to secure obligations — Filing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 284, § 8.

49-17.2-32.
Bond recital conclusive as to authority and purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 32; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-33.
Continuing validity of signatures on bonds and notes — Temporary bonds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 33; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-34.
Sale of bonds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 34; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-35.
Bonds exempt from taxation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 35; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-36.
Persons executing bonds not personally liable. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 36; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-37.
Arrangements for operating and providing railroad service. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 37; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-38.
Grant of operating privileges and use of railroad and facilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 38; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-39.
Payments in lieu of property taxes by contractors using railroad and facilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 39; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

49-17.2-40.
Disposition of property of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 477, § 40; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.